Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4574.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Any health insurance policy, certificate, plan, or contract, including but not limited to a 
health benefit plan, that provides coverage for: 
Habilitative services, shall provide coverage for habilitative speech therapy as a treatment 
for stuttering, regardless of whether the stuttering is classified as developmental. 
Rehabilitative services, shall provide coverage for rehabilitative speech therapy as a 
treatment for stuttering; or 
Both habilitative services and rehabilitative services, shall provide the coverage required 
under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. 
(2) The coverage required under subsection (2) of this section shall: Not be: 

of 2 10  Subject to any maximum annual benefit limit, including any limits on the number of 
visits an insured may make to a speech-language pathologist. 
Limited based on the type of disease, injury, disorder, or other medical condition that 
resulted in the stuttering. 
Limited to cases of childhood stuttering. 
Not be less than the coverage required for health benefit plans; and include the use of any 
communication technology, application, or platform to deliver telehealth services, except 
coverage may be restricted to technology, applications, or platforms that are compliant with any 
applicable privacy provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act 
of 1996, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1320d et seq., as amended. Include service codes 92507 (individual 
service) and 92508 (group service) 
This act shall take effect in 60 days. 
Schedule 
Amendments to 101 CMR 339.04 Fee Schedule 
Service Code Allowable Fee Service Description 
92507 $150 Treatment of speech, language, voice, communication, fluency and/or 
auditory processing disorder; individual (maximum one unit per visit) 
92508 $65 Treatment of speech, language, voice, communication, and/or auditory 
processing disorder; group, two or more individuals (maximum one unit per visit) 
92521 $350 Evaluation of speech fluency (e.g., stuttering, cluttering)